ja: ポリマークレイの半透明性: 不透明; やや半透明; 半透明; 透明/クリア; その他
el: Η ημιδιαφάνεια του πολυμερούς πηλού: Αδιαφανές; Ημιδιαφανές; Διαφώτιστο; Διαφανές/Διαυγές; Άλλο
zh-CN: 软陶透明度: 不透明; 半透光; 透光; 透明/清澈; 其他
ro-RO: Transluciditatea argilei polimerice: Opacă; Semi-translucidă; Translucidă; Transparentă/Clară; Altele
fr: Translucidité de la pâte polymère: Opaque; Semi-translucide; Translucide; Transparent/clair; Autre
th: ความโปร่งแสงของดินโพลิเมอร์: ทึบแสง; กึ่งโปร่งแสง; โปร่งแสง; โปร่งใส/ใส; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Prosojnost polimerne mase: Neprosojno; Polprosojno; Prosojno; Prozorno/čisto; Drugo
hr-HR: Prozirnost polimerne gline: Neprozirno; Djelomično prozirno; Poluprozirno; Prozirno / kristalno čisto; Ostalo
tr: Polimer kilin saydamlığı: Opak; Yarı saydam; Saydam; Şeffaf/Saydam; Diğer
cs: Průsvitnost polymerové hlíny: Neprůhledná; Poloprůsvitná; Průsvitná; Průhledná / čirá; Jiné
nb: Gjennomskinnelighet av polymerleire: Ugjennomsiktig; Halvveis gjennomskinnelig; Gjennomskinnelig; Gjennomsiktig/klar; Annet
ko: 폴리머 클레이 반투명도: 불투명; 반투명; 반투명; 투명/클리어; 기타
de: Transparenz der Polymerknete: Blickdicht; Halbdurchscheinend; Durchscheinend; Transparent/Klar; Sonstige
sv: Polymerlerans genomskinlighet: Ogenomskinlig; Halvtransparent; Translucent; Transparent/klar; Annat
es: Translucidez de la arcilla polimérica: Opaco; Semitranslúcido; Translúcido; Transparente/claro; Otro
hu: Polimer gyurma áttetszősége: Átlátszatlan; Félig áttetsző; Áttetsző; Átlátszó/víztiszta; Egyéb
it: Traslucenza dell'argilla polimerica: Opaco; Semitraslucido; Traslucido; Trasparente/chiaro; Altro
bg-BG: Прозрачност на полимерната глина: Непрозрачна; Слабо полупрозрачна; Полупрозрачна; Прозрачна/безцветна; Други
en: Polymer clay translucency: Opaque; Semi-translucent; Translucent; Transparent/Clear; Other
da: Polymerlers gennemskinnelighed: Uigennemsigtig; Halvgennemsigtig; Gennemskinnelig; Gennemsigtig/klar; Andet
nl: Polymeerklei transparantie: Dekkend; Semi-doorschijnend; Doorschijnend; Transparant/helder; Overig
sk-SK: Priesvitnosť polymérnej hliny: Nepriehľadná; Polopriesvitná; Priesvitná; Priehľadná/číra; Iné
fi: Polymeerisaven läpikuultavuus: Peittävä; Puoliläpikuultava; Läpikuultava; Läpinäkyvä/kirkas; Muu
pl: Przezierność glinki polimerowej: Nieprzezroczysta; Półprzezroczysta; Przeświecająca; Przezroczysta / bezbarwna; Inne
zh-TW: 聚合物黏土半透明度: 不透明; 半透光; 透光; 透明/清澈; 其他
lt-LT: Polimerinio molio skaidrumas: Nepermatomas; Pusiau permatomas; Permatomas; Skaidrus; Kita
pt-BR: Argila polimérica translucidez: Opaco; Semitranslúcido; Translúcido; Transparente/incolor; Outros
vi: Độ trong suốt của đất sét polymer: Mờ đục; Bán trong mờ; Trong mờ; Trong suốt; Khác
ru: Прозрачность полимерной глины: Непрозрачная; Слабо прозрачная; Полупрозрачная; Прозрачная; Другое
pt-PT: Translucidez da argila polimérica: Opaco; Semitranslúcido; Translúcido; Transparente/incolor; Outro